pt-PT: Perfil da base da porca da roda: Esférico (raio); Cónico; Plano (mag); Haste; Estilo anilha; Outro
vi: Hình dạng mặt ghế đai ốc bánh xe: Cầu (bán kính); Nón (thuôn nhọn); Phẳng (đế mag); Trụ; Kiểu vòng đệm; Khác
sv: Hjulmutterns sätesprofil: Kula (radie); Konisk (avsmalnande); Platt (mag-säte); Skaft; Med bricka; Annat
cs: Profil usazení matice kola: Kulový (rádius); Kuželový (zkosený); Plochý (s rovnou dosedací plochou); S dříkem; S podložkou; Jiné
th: รูปทรงของเบาะน็อตล้อ: ลูกบอล (รัศมี); ทรงกรวย (เทเปอร์); แบน (บ่ารับแบบแม็ก); ก้านน็อต; แบบมีแหวนรอง; อื่นๆ
tr: Bijon somunu oturma yüzeyi profili: Küresel (radyüs); Konik (daralan); Düz (mag yuvası); Şaft; Pullu tip; Diğer
bg-BG: Профил на леглото на гайката: Сферична (радиус); Конусовидна; Плоска (mag seat); Цилиндрична; С шайба; Други
nl: Wielmoer zittingprofiel: Bol (radius); Conisch (taps toelopend); Plat (mag-zitting); Schacht; Met ring; Anders
it: Profilo della sede del dado ruota: Sferico (raggio); Conico (rastremato); Piatto (sede mag); Gambo; A rondella; Altro
es: Perfil de asiento de la tuerca de rueda: Esférico (radio); Cónico (ahusado); Plano (asiento mag); Vástago; Estilo arandela; Otro
fr: Profil du siège d’écrou de roue: Boule (rayon); Conique; Plat (portée plate); À tige; À rondelle; Autre
el: Προφίλ έδρας παξιμαδιού τροχού: Σφαιρικό (radius); Κωνικό (tapered); Επίπεδο (mag seat); Με κορμό (shank); Με ροδέλα; Άλλο
ja: ラグナットシートプロファイル: 球面 (半径); テーパー (円錐); 平面 (マグシート); シャンク; ワッシャースタイル; その他
ru: Профиль посадочного места колесной гайки: Сферический (радиус); Конический; Плоский (mag); С направляющей; С шайбой; Другое
zh-TW: 輪圈螺帽座面輪廓: 球面 (半徑); 錐面 (漸縮); 平面 (鎂合金輪圈座); 螺柄; 墊圈樣式; 其他
ro-RO: Profilul de așezare al piuliței de roată: Sferic (rază); Conic; Plat (cu șaibă); Tijă cilindrică; Tip șaibă; Altele
lt-LT: Ratų veržlės sėdynės profilis: Rutulinė (sferinė); Kūginė; Plokščia; Su koteliu; Su poveržle; Kita
hu: Kerékanya felfekvési profilja: Gömb; Kúpos; Lapos (mag seat); Száras; Alátétes; Egyéb
sl-SI: Profil ležišča kolesne matice: Okrogla (polkrožna); Stožčasta (konična); Ravna (mag seat); Z vratom (shank); S podložko; Drugo
pt-BR: Porca de roda perfil de assento: Esférico (raio); Cônico (afunilado); Plano (assento Mag); Haste; Estilo arruela; Outro
ko: 러그 너트 시트 프로파일: 볼(반경); 원추형(테이퍼드); 평면형(매그 시트); 섕크; 와셔 스타일; 기타
zh-CN: 轮毂螺母座轮廓: 球面（半径）; 锥面（斜面）; 平面（镁合金轮毂座）; 柱形; 垫圈式; 其他
fi: Pyöränmutterin istukan profiili: Pallokartio (säde); Suorakartio; Tasainen; Holkki; Aluslevyllinen; Muu
en: Lug nut seat profile: Ball (radius); Conical (tapered); Flat (mag seat); Shank; Washer style; Other
nb: Hjulmutter-seteprofil: Kule (radius); Konisk (avsmalnende); Flat (mag-sete); Styrestift; Skivestil; Annet
da: Anlægsprofil på hjulmøtrikken: Kugleformet (radius); Konisk; Flad (mag-sæde); Skaft; Med spændeskive; Andet
pl: Profil gniazda nakrętki koła: Gniazdo kulowe; Stożkowe (zwężane); Płaskie (gniazdo mag); Z tuleją (shank); Z podkładką; Inne
de: Profil des Radmuttersitzes: Kugelbund (Radius); Kegelbund (konisch); Flachbund (Mag-Sitz); Schaft; Mit Unterlegscheibe; Sonstige
sk-SK: Profil dosadacej plochy matice kolesa: Guľový (rádius); Kužeľový; Plochý (s podložkou); S osadením (shank); S plochou podložkou; Iné
hr-HR: Profil sjedišta matice: Kuglasto (radijus); Konusno; Ravno (mag sjedište); S ravnim vratom (Shank); S podloškom; Ostalo